Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.060

Disclaimer of public liability.

No public agency, public official, public employee, or custodian shall be liable, nor shall a cause of action exist, for any loss or damage based upon the release of a public record if the public agency, public official, public employee, or custodian acted in good faith in attempting to comply with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1992 c 139 s 11. Formerly RCW 42.17.258.]